Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2224
Nursing license; reciprocity; compact requirements.

Before recognizing a home state license to practice nursing issued by a state which is a party to the Nurse Licensure Compact, the board shall determine that such state's qualifications for a nursing license are substantially equivalent to or more stringent than the minimum qualifications for issuance of a Nebraska license under the Nurse Practice Act.

Laws 2000, LB 523, § 4;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,132.19;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 780.

Nurse Licensure Compact, see section 71-1795.01.